Utah statutes.
59-1-901.   Creation -- Members -- Terms.

(1)  There is created a state commission to be known as the Utah Tax Review Commission.

(2) (a)  The Utah Tax Review Commission shall be composed of 16 members as follows:

(i)  two members shall be appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives from the House of Representatives, not more than one of whom may be from the same political party;

(ii)  two members shall be appointed by the president of the Senate from the Senate, not more than one of whom may be from the same political party;

(iii)  five members shall be appointed by the governor, not more than three of whom may be from the same political party;

(iv)  one member who is a member of the State Tax Commission, appointed by the State Tax Commission, shall be an ex officio member of the Utah Tax Review Commission;

(v)  one member who is the House of Representatives chair of the Revenue and Taxation Interim Committee shall be an ex officio member of the Utah Tax Review Commission; and

(vi)  one member who is the Senate chair of the Revenue and Taxation Interim Committee shall be an ex officio member of the Utah Tax Review Commission.

(b)  The 12 members appointed under Subsection (2)(a) shall then select four additional members with consideration to be given to achieving ethnic, cultural, and gender diversity, representation from the major geographical areas of the state, and equal bipartisan representation.

(3) (a)  Except for members appointed under Subsections (2)(a)(i), (ii), (v), and (vi), and except as required by Subsection (3)(b), members shall be appointed to four-year terms.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (3)(a), the governor shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of commission members are staggered so that approximately half of the commission is appointed every two years.



Amended by Chapter 288, 2007 General Session

